Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-4730
Commission; agreements; contracts; enter into.

The commission may make agreements with other state agencies and may contract with other individuals, organizations, corporations, associations, or other legal entities including private agencies or any department or agency of the federal government or the state or any political subdivision thereof, to carry out the functions and purposes of the commission.

Laws 1979, LB 101, § 11.